Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 2. Aerial Spraying

§§ 10-2-201 through 10-2-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 90, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 142, §§ 1 through 5, related to aerial spraying, spreading of seeds, weather-modification, dusting, fertilizing, baiting and predator or insect control.